District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

25-340

Special restrictions for Ward 4.

Repealed.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(o), 51 DCR 6525
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 81(a), 59 DCR 6190

History

The effective date of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Amendment Act of 2004, passed on 2nd reading on May 18, 2004 (Enrolled version of Bill 15-516), referred to this section, is September 30, 2004.

References in Text